pl: Styl tyłu odzieży: Bez pleców; Z krzyżującymi się paskami; Z wycięciem na plecach; Zabudowane plecy; Wysokie plecy; Z wycięciem w kształcie łezki; Z głębokim dekoltem na plecach; Z siatką na plecach; Odkryte plecy; Typu bokserka (racerback); Zaokrąglony dekolt na plecach; Z cienkimi ramiączkami; Inny
fr: Style du dos du vêtement: Dos nu; Dos croisé; Dos découpé; Dos plein; Dos haut; Dos en goutte d’eau; Dos échancré; Dos en résille; Dos ouvert; Dos nageur; Dos arrondi; Dos à bretelles; Autre
el: Στυλ πλάτης ενδύματος: Εξώπλατο; Πλάτη με χιαστί τιράντες; Πλάτη με ανοίγματα; Κλειστή πλάτη; Ψηλή πλάτη; Πλάτη με άνοιγμα keyhole; Χαμηλή πλάτη; Πλάτη με δίχτυ; Ανοιχτή πλάτη; Αθλητική πλάτη; Πλάτη με βαθύ άνοιγμα; Πλάτη με πολλά λουράκια; Άλλο
zh-TW: 服裝背面款式: 露背; 交叉露背; 鏤空露背; 全包背; 高露背; 鑰匙孔露背; 低露背; 網眼背; 敞背式; 挖背; 大圓領露背; 綁帶露背; 其他
sk-SK: Štýl chrbta odevu: Bez chrbta; Prekrížený chrbát; Vykrojený chrbát; Plný chrbát; Vysoký chrbát; Chrbát so slzičkou; Nízky chrbát; Sieťovaný chrbát; Otvorený chrbát; Športový chrbát; Okrúhly výstrih na chrbte; Ramienkový chrbát; Iný
ro-RO: Stilul spatelui hainei: Fără spate; Spate în cruce; Spate decupat; Spate acoperit; Spate înalt; Spate cu decupaj (keyhole); Spate coborât; Spate din plasă; Spate gol; Spate tip înotător (racerback); Spate rotunjit adânc; Spate cu barete; Altele
ru: Стиль спинки одежды: С открытой спиной; С перекрестными лямками на спине; С вырезом на спине; Закрытая спина; С высокой спинкой; С вырезом «капля» на спине; С глубоким вырезом на спине; Сетчатая спинка; Открытая спина; Борцовка; Овальный вырез на спине; С ремешками на спине; Другое
pt-BR: Estilo das costas da peça: Costas nuas; Costas cruzadas; Costas com recortes; Costas fechadas; Costas altas; Costas com abertura gota; Costas decotadas; Costas em tela; Costas abertas; Costas nadador; Costas redondas; Costas com tiras; Outro
zh-CN: 服装背面款式: 露背; 交叉背; 镂空背; 全包背; 高背; 钥匙孔背; 低背; 网眼背; 敞背; 挖背; U 型领背; 绑带背; 其他
tr: Giysinin arka tasarımı: Sırtı açık; Çapraz sırt; Pencereli sırt; Kapalı sırt; Yüksek sırt; Anahtar deliği sırt; Düşük sırt; File sırt; Açık sırt; Yüzücü sırtı; U sırt; Askılı sırt; Diğer
sl-SI: Slog hrbtnega dela oblačila: Z odprtim hrbtom; Prekrižan na hrbtu; Z izrezom na hrbtu; Poln hrbet; Visok hrbet; S ključavničastim izrezom na hrbtu; Nizek hrbet; Mrežast hrbet; Odprt hrbet; Športni hrbet; Zaobljen hrbet; S paščki na hrbtu; Drugo
de: Rückenstil des Kleidungsstücks: Rückenfrei; Überkreuzter Rücken; Rücken mit Cut-out; Geschlossener Rücken; Hoher Rücken; Schlüsselloch-Rücken; Tiefer Rücken; Mesh-Rücken; Offener Rücken; Racerback; U-Ausschnitt hinten; Rücken mit Riemchen; Sonstige
en: Garment back style: Backless; Crisscross back; Cut-out back; Full back; High back; Keyhole back; Low back; Mesh back; Open back; Racerback; Scoop back; Strappy back; Other
ja: 衣服の背面スタイル: バックレス; クリスクロスバック; カットアウトバック; フルバック; ハイバック; キーホールバック; ローバック; メッシュバック; オープンバック; レーサーバック; スクープバック; ストラッピーバック; その他
hr-HR: Stil leđa odjeće: Otvorena leđa; Prekrižena leđa; S izrezom na leđima; Zatvorena leđa; Visoka leđa; Leđa s izrezom u obliku ključanice; Duboki izrez na leđima; Mrežasta leđa; Otvorena leđa; Racerback; U-izrez na leđima; Leđa s naramenicama; Ostalo
it: Stile del retro del capo: Schiena scoperta; Incrociato sulla schiena; Con tagli sulla schiena; Schiena coperta; Scollo alto posteriore; A goccia sulla schiena; Scollatura profonda sulla schiena; Schiena in rete; Aperto sulla schiena; All’americana; Scollo rotondo sulla schiena; Con listini sulla schiena; Altro
vi: Kiểu lưng áo: Hở lưng; Lưng đan chéo; Lưng khoét lỗ; Kín lưng; Lưng cao; Lưng khoét giọt nước; Lưng trễ; Lưng phối lưới; Lưng trần; Lưng chữ Y; Lưng khoét sâu; Lưng nhiều dây; Khác
nl: Rugstijl van kledingstuk: Met blote rug; Gekruiste rug; Cut-out rug; Volledige rug; Hoge rug; Keyhole-rug; Lage rug; Mesh-rug; Open rug; Racerback; Scoop-rug; Strappy-rug; Overig
cs: Styl zadní části oděvu: Bez zad; Překřížená záda; Prostřižená záda; Plná záda; Vysoká záda; Slzičkový výkroj na zádech; Hluboký výstřih na zádech; Záda ze síťoviny; Odhalená záda; Zápasnická záda; Kulatý výstřih na zádech; Záda s ramínky; Ostatní
hu: Ruha hátuljának stílusa: Hát nélküli; Keresztpántos hátú; Kivágott hátú; Zárt hátú; Magas hátú; Kulcslyuk kivágású hát; Mélyen kivágott hátú; Hálós hátú; Nyitott hátú; Birkózóhátú; Mély kerek kivágású hát; Pántos hátú; Egyéb
lt-LT: Drabužio nugaros stilius: Be nugaros; Sukryžiuota nugara; Iškirpta nugara; Uždara nugara; Aukšta nugara; Lašo formos iškirptė nugaroje; Gili iškirptė nugaroje; Tinklinė nugara; Atvira nugara; Sportinė nugara („Racerback“); U raidės iškirptė nugaroje; Su dirželiais nugaroje; Kita
es: Estilo de la parte posterior de la prenda: Sin espalda; Espalda cruzada; Espalda con aberturas; Espalda cubierta; Espalda alta; Espalda con abertura en forma de gota; Espalda baja; Espalda de malla; Espalda descubierta; Espalda deportiva; Espalda escotada; Espalda con tiras; Otro
da: Rygdesign på beklædning: Rygløs; Krydsryg; Cut-out-ryg; Hel ryg; Høj ryg; Nøglehulsryg; Lav ryg; Mesh-ryg; Åben ryg; Racerryg; Dyb rygudskæring; Stropryg; Andet
ko: 의류 뒷면 스타일: 백리스; 크리스크로스 백; 컷아웃 백; 풀 백; 하이 백; 키홀 백; 로우 백; 메시 백; 오픈 백; 레이서백; 스쿱 백; 스트래피 백; 기타
fi: Vaatteen selkäosan tyyli: Avoselkäinen; Ristiselkäinen; Aukollinen selkämys; Peittävä selkämys; Korkea selkämys; Avaimenreikäselkämys; Matala selkämys; Verkkoselkämys; Avoin selkämys; Painijanselkämys; U-selkämys; Nyöritetty selkämys; Muu
sv: Plaggets ryggstil: Bar rygg; Korslagd rygg; Utskuren rygg; Heltäckande rygg; Hög rygg; Nyckelhålsrygg; Låg rygg; Rygg i mesh; Öppen rygg; Brottarrygg; Djup U-ringning i ryggen; Rygg med smala band; Övrigt
bg-BG: Стил на гърба на дрехата: Гол гръб; Гръб с кръстосани презрамки; Изрязан гръб; Цял гръб; Висок гръб; Гръб с отвор тип ключалка; Дълбоко изрязан гръб; Мрежест гръб; Открит гръб; Състезателен гръб; Гръб с овално деколте; Гръб с множество презрамки; Друго
th: สไตล์ด้านหลังของเสื้อผ้า: เปิดหลัง; หลังไขว้; เจาะหลัง; ปิดหลัง; หลังสูง; หลังเจาะรูปหยดน้ำ; หลังลึก; หลังตาข่าย; โชว์หลัง; เว้าหลัง; หลังคว้าน; หลังแต่งสาย; อื่นๆ
pt-PT: estilo das costas da peça: Sem costas; Costas cruzadas; Costas com aberturas; Costas fechadas; Costas altas; Costas em gota; Costas baixas; Costas em rede; Costas abertas; Costas à nadador; Costas redondas; Costas com tiras; Outro
nb: Plaggets ryggstil: Ryggløs; Kryssrygg; Utskjæring i ryggen; Hel rygg; Høy rygg; Nøkkelhullrygg; Lav rygg; Nettingrygg; Åpen rygg; Bryterrygg; Dyp utringning bak; Rygg med stropper; Annet